Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 3

City Judge — City Court

6-4-301. City judge — Jurisdiction — Appointment — Qualifications and compensation — Elections.

There shall be a city court presided over by a city judge appointed by the board or elected as provided in subsection (c).

Where the city judge is appointed, the city judge shall have the qualifications, term of office, if any, and receive the compensation the board may provide by ordinance.

The board may appoint the general sessions court judge of the county or counties in which the municipality lies to act as city judge to the extent the general sessions court judge agrees to act as city judge.

In the absence or disability of the city judge, the mayor may designate a qualified person to serve as city judge or, to the extent the general sessions court judge agrees to serve as city judge, may designate the general sessions court judge of the county or counties in which the municipality lies to be acting city judge until one can be appointed at the next regularly scheduled meeting of the board, or as otherwise provided by ordinance.

The board may require, by ordinance, that the city judge meet the constitutional qualifications and be elected in the same manner as a judge of an inferior court. Constitutional provisions applicable to judges of inferior courts shall apply to the elected city judge.

If an elected city judge is temporarily unable to preside over the city court for any reason, then, to the extent a general sessions court judge agrees to serve temporarily as city judge, the judge shall appoint a general sessions judge of the county or counties within which the municipality lies to sit in the judge's place. If no general sessions judge is available, then the city judge shall appoint an attorney, meeting the same qualifications as a general sessions judge, to sit temporarily.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1992, ch. 612, § 10; 1996, ch. 652, §§ 2, 3; 2004, ch. 914, § 6a; 2011, ch. 453, §§ 2-4.

Compiler's Notes. General sessions judges may have city judge jurisdiction pursuant to this section.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. General sessions judge acting as city judge, OAG 94-012, 1994 Tenn. AG LEXIS 9 (2/3/94).

City courts have jurisdiction to enforce a child curfew law against a parent, OAG 00-158, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 161 (10/17/00).

6-4-302. Power to enforce ordinances.

The city judge may impose fines, costs and forfeitures, and punish by fine for violation of city ordinances.

The judge may preserve and enforce order in the court and enforce the collection of all fines, costs and forfeitures imposed.

In default of payment, or good and sufficient security given for the payment of any fines or forfeitures imposed, if:

The court has concurrent jurisdiction with the general sessions court, the judge is authorized to enter an order in accordance with § 40-24-104 which, in accordance with such section, may include imprisonment until the fine, or any portion of it, is paid. No such imprisonment shall exceed the period of time established in § 40-24-104, for any one (1) offense or violation;

The court does not have concurrent jurisdiction with the general sessions court, the judge is authorized to enter an order for contempt of court for the payment of the fine in the amount established pursuant to § 16-18-306.

Fines may be paid in installments in the manner provided by ordinance or in accordance with § 40-24-104. Any court is authorized to enforce the collection of unpaid fines or forfeitures as a judgment in a civil action in any court with competent jurisdiction in accordance with § 40-24-105. The city judge may remit, with or without condition, fines and costs imposed for violation of any ordinance provision.

Acts 1991, ch. 154, § 1; 1995, ch. 13, § 5; 2011, ch. 453, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. City courts are limited to monetary penalties against a parent in enforcing curfew violations, OAG 00-158, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 161 (10/17/00).